Iowa, session 2025-2026, HJR5.
Be it enacted by the people of the state of Iowa:â. 5 Sec. 3. Appropriations by initiative ââ effective date of 6 initiated laws ââ conflicting laws concurrently adopted. An 7 initiative shall not appropriate any moneys other than new 8 revenues created and provided for in the initiative. Except as 9 otherwise provided in this Constitution, a law or amendment to 10 the Constitution proposed by an initiative takes effect when 11 approved by a majority of the votes cast thereon, unless a 12 later date is specified in the initiative. When conflicting 13 laws or amendments to the Constitution are approved at the same 14 election, the law or amendment to the Constitution receiving 15 the largest affirmative vote shall prevail. 16 Sec. 4. Referendum ââ exceptions ââ procedure. A referendum 17 to approve a bill passed by the general assembly, other than 18 laws necessary for the immediate preservation of the public 19 peace, health, or safety and laws making appropriations for the 20 current expenses of the state government, for the maintenance 21 of state institutions, or for the support of public schools, 22 may be ordered by a petition signed by a number of qualified 23 electors in each of at least three-fourths of the congressional 24 districts in the state equal to five percent of the total votes 25 cast in the district for governor at the general election 26 immediately preceding the filing of the petition in which votes 27 were cast for the office of governor. Referendum petitions 28 shall be filed with the secretary of state not more than 29 ninety days after the final adjournment of the session of the 30 general assembly in which the bill that is the subject of the 31 referendum was passed. A referendum shall be presented to the 32 people at the general election next held after the submission 33 of the petition to the secretary of state. 34 A bill referred to the people is not subject to approval or 35 -2- LSB 1145YH (5) 91 ss/ns 2/ 4 H.J.R. 5 veto by the governor and the approval or veto of a bill later 1 referred to the people shall be void. A bill referred to the 2 people shall take effect upon the approval of the referendum 3 by a majority of qualified electors who cast votes thereon, 4 regardless of any effective date stated in the bill. 5 Sec. 2. REFERRAL AND PUBLICATION. The foregoing proposed 6 amendment to the Constitution of the State of Iowa is referred 7 to the general assembly to be chosen at the next general 8 election for members of the general assembly, and shall be 9 published as provided by law for three months previous to the 10 date of that election. 11